Maine, session 132, LD1343.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §10050 is enacted to read:
§10050. Right to harvest fish and wildlife; limitations
1. Right to harvest fish and wildlife. Pursuant to the right to food as declared in the
Constitution of Maine, Article I, Section 25, the people of this State have the right to harvest
fish and wildlife by hunting, fishing or trapping for their own nourishment, sustenance,
bodily health or well-being.
2. Limitation. The exercise of the right to harvest fish and wildlife is expressly limited
by all applicable laws, rules and regulations authorized pursuant to this Title, which the
department shall enforce.
Page 1 - 132LR0495(07)